Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3919.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SAFE ROAD ZONES GRANTS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for grants to local units of government to perform additional traffic safety enforcement activities in safe road zones under Minnesota Statutes, section 169.065. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end